Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4504
Definitions, sections found.

As used in the Long-Term Care Insurance Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 44-4505 to 44-4510 shall be used.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 4.